Florida, session 2026, HB111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 16.571, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
16.571 Antisemitism Task Force.—
(1) The Antisemitism Task Force, a task force as defined
in s. 20.03(5), is created adjunct to the Office of Civil Rights
within the Department of Legal Affairs for the express purpose
of combating antisemitism in this state. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the task force shall operate in a
manner consistent with s. 20.052. The department shall provide
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 111 2026
administrative and staff support relating to the functions of
the task force.
(2)(a) The task force is composed of the following
members:
1. Three members appointed by the President of the Senate,
one of whom must be a representative of a Jewish community
organization in this state and one of whom must have expertise
in combating antisemitism. The President of the Senate shall
designate one of his or her appointees as co-chair of the task
force.
2. Three members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, one of whom must be a representative of a
Jewish community organization in this state and one of whom must
have expertise in combating antisemitism. The Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall designate one of his or her
appointees as co-chair of the task force.
3. One member of the Senate appointed by the Minority
Leader of the Senate.
4. One member of the House of Representatives appointed by
the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.
5. Two members appointed by the Governor, one of whom must
have legal expertise in civil rights law.
6. The Attorney General or his or her designee.
7. The Commissioner of Education or his or her designee.
8. The chair of the Florida Commission on Human Relations
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 111 2026
or his or her designee.
9. One member appointed by the Florida Association of
Counties.
10. One member appointed by the Florida League of Cities.
11. One member appointed by the Florida Prosecuting
Attorneys Association.
12. One member appointed by the Florida Police Chiefs
Association.
13. One member appointed by the Florida Association of
District School Superintendents.
(b) Members of the task force shall serve 2-year terms. A
vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term
in the same manner as the original appointment.
(c) Members of the task force shall serve without
compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for per diem and
travel expenses in accordance with s. 112.061.
(3) The task force shall hold its first meeting by August
1, 2026. The task force shall convene at least once quarterly
but may meet more often as necessary to complete the duties
prescribed in this section.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Identify and acknowledge the growing threat of
antisemitism in this state by conducting a comprehensive review
of the prevalence of antisemitism within this state.
(b) Strengthen community relations by identifying and
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 111 2026
creating opportunities for new connections between state and
local governments and the local Jewish community.
(c) Engage with the community and provide public officials
across this state with recommendations and support for combating
antisemitism.
(d) Advise on training programs for law enforcement
relating to the investigation and prosecution of hate crimes.
(e) Assess existing state programs relating to education
in digital media literacy, including identifying educational
gaps, studying education efficacy, and planning for enhanced
educational offerings.
(f) Identify best practices from efforts to combat
antisemitism in other states and jurisdictions.
(g) Evaluate this state's hate crime statutes and consider
whether amendments thereto would better protect residents from
antisemitism.
(h) Recommend strategies, programs, and legislation to
combat antisemitism in this state. The initial report provided
pursuant to paragraph (i) shall examine antisemitism in schools
and universities.
(i) Before January 31 of each year, submit a report and
policy recommendations to the Governor, the President of the
Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
Minority Leader of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the House
100 of Representatives, the chair of the Judiciary Committee of the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb111-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 111 2026
101 Senate, and the chair of the Security and Threat Assessment
102 Committee of the House of Representatives.
103 (5) In accordance with s. 20.052(8), this section is
104 repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
105 through reenactment by the Legislature.
106 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb111-00